Utah statutes.
39-6-74.   Desertion.
(1)  A member of the National Guard is guilty of desertion who:
(a)  without authority leaves or remains absent from his unit, organization,
or place of duty with intent to remain away from it permanently;
(b)  quits his unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid
hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or
(c)  without being regularly separated from one of the forces of the National
Guard enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the
armed forces of the National Guard without fully disclosing the fact that he
has not been regularly separated.
(2)  A commissioned officer of the National Guard who, after tender of his
resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his post or duties
without leave and with intent to remain away permanently is guilty of
desertion.
(3)  A person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished
as a military court directs.
